sms/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuammel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuäʹmmel contract stem jänis: # Noun - full paradigm
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Nom: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Gen: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Acc: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Ill: njuäʹmmla
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Loc: njuäʹmmlest
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Com: njuäʹmmlin
     njuäʹmmel+N+Ess: njuäʹmmlen
     njuäʹmmel+N+Par: njuäʹmmled
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Abe: [njuäʹmmeltaa, njuäʹmmeltää]
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Nom: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Gen: njuäʹmmli
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Acc: njuäʹmmlid
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Ill: njuäʹmmlid
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Loc: njuäʹmmlin
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Com: njuäʹmmlivuiʹm
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Abe: [njuäʹmmlitaa, njuäʹmmlitää]
     
